District of Columbia statutes.
8-438.01

Pesticide Registration Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Pesticide Registration Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from fees collected pursuant to § 8-438 and other pesticide license and registration fees.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for the administration of the Department’s pesticide, chemical, tank, land remediation, and wildlife protection programs.

(d)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

History

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 9a
as added Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6072, 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6042, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “chemical, tank, land remediation, and wildlife protection” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6072 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6072 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6052 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6042 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6042 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Section 6071 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle H of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Pesticide Registration Fund Preservation Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.